Utah statutes.
59-14-604.   Prohibition against stamping, sale, or import of cigarettes not
in the directory -- Requirement to certify compliance.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person:
(a)  to affix a stamp to a package or other container of cigarettes of a
tobacco product manufacturer or brand family not included in the directory
required by Section 59-14-603; or
(b)  to sell, offer, or possess for sale, in this state, or import for
personal consumption in this state, cigarettes of a tobacco product
manufacturer or brand family not included in the directory required by Section
59-14-603.
(2) (a)  It is unlawful for any person to sell or distribute cigarettes, or
acquire, hold, own, possess, transport, import, or cause to be imported
cigarettes, that the person knows or should know are intended for distribution
or sale in the state in violation of Section 59-14-603.
(b)  A violation of this Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor.
